North Carolina, session 2025, HB66.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 163-166.40(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Not earlier than the third Thursday second Monday before an election in which a voter
seeks to vote and not later than 3:00 P.M. on the last Saturday before that election, the voter may
appear in person only at the office of the county board of elections, except as provided in
G.S. 163-166.35. A county board of elections shall conduct early voting on the last Saturday
before the election from 8:00 A.M. until 3:00 P.M."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*H66-v-2*